src/fst/morphology/stems/sma-acronyms.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø & the Norwegian Sámi Parliament
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@uit.no or feedback@divvun.no

LEXICON Acronym-sma


NoeriTV	ACRO_BERN ;

Jå1+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR:Jå1 ACRO ;
Jå2+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR:Jå2 ACRO ;
Jå3+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR:Jå3 ACRO ;
Jåa1+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR:Jåa1 ACRO ;
Jåa2+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR:Jåa2 ACRO ;
Jåa3+N+Prop+Sem/Org+ACR:Jåa3 ACRO ;
SÅG+N+Prop+Sem/Org:SÅG ACRO_BERN ;
aktesne.no+N+Prop+Sem/Obj:aktesne.no ACRO_ACCRA ;
G1+N+Sem/Hum+ACR:G1 ACRONOUN ;
G2+N+Sem/Hum+ACR:G2 ACRONOUN ;

CDe+N+ACR+Use/NotDNorm:CDe ACRO-TODO ; ! https://satni.uit.no/termwiki/index.php?title=Dihtorteknologiija_ja_diehtoteknihkka:CDe ! Er dette rett form? Kva med fleirtal ine? Kvifor skal -e skrivast ut?
